Idaho, session 2025, H0426.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Office of the State Controller the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
I. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $164,700 $9,500 $174,200
II. STATEWIDE ACCOUNTING:
FROM:
General
Fund $550,800 $19,000 $569,800
III. COMPUTER CENTER:
FROM:
Data Processing Services
Fund $5,500,000 $5,500,000


FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
IV. ENTERPRISE BUSINESS OPERATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,507,300 $6,800,000 $9,307,300
GRAND TOTAL $3,222,800 $12,328,500 $15,551,300
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Office of the State Controller for personnel
costs is hereby reduced by the following amounts for the designated programs
and funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
I. COMPUTER CENTER:
FROM:
DataProcessingServices
Fund $264,400
II. ENTERPRISE BUSINESS OPERATIONS:
FROM:
BusinessInformationInfrastructure
Fund $43,900
GRAND TOTAL $308,300
SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the State Controller is hereby increased by ten (10.00) for the period
July 1, 2025 through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. INDIRECT COST RECOVERY. The moneys assessed by the Division
of Financial Management in accordance with Section 67-3531, Idaho Code, for
the Office of the State Controller services shall be placed in the Indirect
Cost Recovery Fund. On June 30, 2026, the State Controller shall transfer
the amount assessed in the statewide cost allocation plan from the Indirect
Cost Recovery Fund to the state General Fund.
SECTION 5. ACCOUNTING CORRECTION. Pursuant to Section 67-3604, Idaho
Code, the State Controller shall make needed adjustments as hereby autho-
rized to correct an accounting data entry error of $1,074,400 in the Divi-
sion of Veterans Services caused by an erroneous billing from the Department
of Administration resulting from fiscal year 2024 activities, for the period
July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2025. The Division of Veterans Services and
the State Controller shall process corrective accounting entries and pro-


vide a report to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee and the Legisla-
tive Services Office by June 30, 2025, that includes an account of the cor-
rections made.
SECTION 6. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, section 5 of this act shall be in full force and effect
upon passage and approval, and sections 1, 2, 3, 4 and 6 of this act shall be
in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.